Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1529
Reimbursement; assignment; authorized.

Nothing in the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act shall be construed to prohibit a responsible person from assigning to a third party any right, title, or interest which the responsible person may have in and to the proceeds from reimbursement for remedial action. Such third party may be a designated representative for the purposes of the act.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 29.